Utah statutes.
58-40-601.   Scope of practice.

(1)  A master therapeutic recreation specialist licensed under this chapter may:

(a)  practice recreational therapy:

(i)  as an employee of a hospital, clinic, agency, or other facility;

(ii)  in private practice; or

(iii)  as a consultant; and

(b)  supervise and train other licensees under this chapter.

(2)  A therapeutic recreation specialist licensed under this chapter:

(a)  may practice recreational therapy as the employee of a hospital, clinic, agency, or other facility;

(b)  may not practice recreational therapy in private practice or as a consultant; and

(c)  may supervise other licensees under this chapter.

(3)  A therapeutic recreation technician:

(a)  may perform recreational therapy services if:

(i)  under the supervision of a master therapeutic recreation specialist or a therapeutic recreation specialist employed full-time and on-site in the same hospital, clinic, or facility; or

(ii)  in consultation with a master therapeutic recreation specialist;

(b)  may maintain the ongoing documentation of services provided in accordance with a treatment or intervention plan if:

(i)  under the supervision of either a master therapeutic recreation specialist or a therapeutic recreation specialist employed full-time and on-site in the same hospital, clinic, or facility; or

(ii)  in consultation with a master therapeutic recreation specialist;

(c) may perform the portion of an assessment described in Subsection 58-40-102(2)(a)(i);

(d)  may not perform the portion of an assessment described in Subsection 58-40-102(2)(a)(ii);

(e)  may not prescribe or create a treatment or intervention plan; and

(f)  may not approve or cosign a modification to a treatment or intervention plan.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 82, 2012 General Session

